Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
In General

§ 43-1-1.
Department of Human Services to be State Department of Public Welfare [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The Department of Human Services shall be the State Department of Public Welfare and shall retain all powers and duties as granted to the State Department of Public Welfare. Wherever the term “State Department of Public Welfare” or “State Board of Public Welfare” appears in any law, the same shall mean the Department of Human Services. The Executive Director of Human Services may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties deemed appropriate to carry out the lawful functions of the department.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7217; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 34; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 61; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 17; Laws, 1992, ch. 585 § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 599, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 573, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2019, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-1-2.
Mississippi Department of Human Services; Executive Director of Human Services; Joint Oversight Committee; powers of executive director; structure of department [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

There is created the Mississippi Department of Human Services, whose offices shall be located in Jackson, Mississippi, and which shall be under the policy direction of the Governor.

The chief administrative officer of the department shall be the Executive Director of Human Services. The Governor shall appoint the Executive Director of Human Services with the advice and consent of the Senate, and he shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Governor, and until his successor is appointed and qualified. The Executive Director of Human Services shall possess the following qualifications:

A bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and ten (10) years’ experience in management, public administration, finance or accounting; or

A master’s or doctoral degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and five (5) years’ experience in management, public administration, finance or accounting.

Those qualifications shall be certified by the State Personnel Board.

There shall be a Joint Oversight Committee of the Department of Human Services composed of the respective Chairmen of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee, the House Public Health and Human Services Committee and the House Appropriations Committee, three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve at the will and pleasure of the Lieutenant Governor, and three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House to serve at the will and pleasure of the Speaker. The chairmanship of the committee shall alternate for twelve-month periods between the Senate members and the House members, on May 1 of each year, with the Chairman of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee serving as chairman beginning in even-numbered years, and the Chairman of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee serving as chairman beginning in odd-numbered years. The committee shall meet once each quarter, or upon the call of the chairman at such times as he deems necessary or advisable, and may make recommendations to the Legislature pertaining to any matter within the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Department of Human Services. The appointing authorities may designate an alternate member from their respective houses to serve when the regular designee is unable to attend such meetings of the oversight committee. For attending meetings of the oversight committee, such legislators shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the committee will be paid while the Legislature is in session. No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the oversight committee without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses.

The Department of Human Services shall provide the services authorized by law to every individual determined to be eligible therefor, and in carrying out the purposes of the department, the executive director is authorized:

To formulate the policy of the department regarding human services within the jurisdiction of the department;

To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from, and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department under any and all statutes within the department’s jurisdiction, all of which shall be binding upon the county departments of human services;

To apply for, receive and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, devises, bequests or funds from any other source;

Except as limited by Section 43-1-3, to enter into and execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the programs of the department; and

To discharge such other duties, responsibilities and powers as are necessary to implement the programs of the department.

The executive director shall establish the organizational structure of the Mississippi Department of Human Services which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law, including, but not limited to:

Office of Family Children’s Services;

Office of Youth Services;

Office of Economic Assistance;

Office of Child Support Enforcement; or

Office of Field Operations to administer any state or county level programs under the purview of the Mississippi Department of Human Services, with the exception of programs which fall under paragraphs (a) and (b) above.

The Executive Director of Human Services shall appoint heads of offices, bureaus and divisions, as defined in Section 7-17-11, who shall serve at the pleasure of the executive director. The salary and compensation of such office, bureau and division heads shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Personnel Board as created under Section 25-9-101 et seq. The executive director shall have the authority to organize offices as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department. The organization charts of the department shall be presented annually with the budget request of the Governor for review by the Legislature.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 59; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 18; Laws, 1991, ch. 608, § 27; Laws, 1992, ch. 585 § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 15; Laws, 2001, ch. 599, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 573, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 537, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 470, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 403, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2019, ch. 372, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-1-3.
Delegation, privatization, or contracting with private entity for operation of office, bureau or division of department prohibited; contracts for improvement of performance or efficiency of services authorized [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Notwithstanding the authority granted under subsection (4)(d) of Section 43-1-2, the Department of Human Services or the Executive Director of Human Services shall not be authorized to delegate, privatize or otherwise enter into a contract with a private entity for the operation of any office, bureau or division of the department, as defined in Section 7-17-11, without specific authority to do so by general act of the Legislature. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate (a) any contract of the department that is in place and operational before January 1, 1994; or (b) the continued renewal of any such contract with the same entity upon the expiration of the contract; or (c) the execution of a contract with another legal entity as a replacement of any such contract that is expiring, provided that the replacement contract is substantially the same as the expiring contract. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Human Services or the Executive Director of Human Services from entering into any contract with vendors or contractors intended to improve performance, reduce costs or increase efficiency, so long as the contract remains under the supervision or control of an office, bureau or division of the department, and provided that no county office of the department may be closed unless the Legislature specifically authorizes its closure in advance of the closure.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 599, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 573, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 537, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 470, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 515, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 403, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2019, ch. 372, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-1-4.
Powers and duties of department.

The Department of Human Services shall have the following powers and duties:

To provide basic services and assistance statewide to needy and disadvantaged individuals and families.

To promote integration of the many services and programs within its jurisdiction at the client level thus improving the efficiency and effectiveness of service delivery and providing easier access to clients.

To develop a statewide comprehensive service delivery plan in coordination with the Board of Health, the Board of Mental Health, and the Department of Finance and Administration. Such plan shall be developed and presented to the Governor by January 1, 1990.

To employ personnel and expend funds appropriated to the department to carry out the duties and responsibilities assigned to the department by law.

To fingerprint and conduct a background investigation on every employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer (i) who has direct access to clients of the department who are children or vulnerable adults, (ii) who is in a position of fiduciary responsibility, (iii) who is in a position with access to Federal Tax Information (FTI), or (iv) who is otherwise required by federal law or regulations to undergo a background investigation. Every such employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer shall provide a valid current social security number and/or driver’s license number which shall be furnished to conduct the background investigation for determination as to good moral character and to ensure that no person placed in any position referenced in this paragraph has a felony conviction that would prevent employment or access to Federal Tax Information according to department policy. If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a fingerprint-based national criminal history record check. The department shall be the recipient of the results of any background investigation and/or criminal history record check performed in accordance with this paragraph.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 60; Laws, 2005, ch. 431, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005; Laws, 2018, ch. 420, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-1-5.
Duties of department [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

It shall be the duty of the Department of Human Services to:

Establish and maintain programs not inconsistent with the terms of this chapter and the rules, regulations and policies of the Department of Human Services, and publish the rules and regulations of the department pertaining to such programs.

Make such reports in such form and containing such information as the federal government may, from time to time, require, and comply with such provisions as the federal government may, from time to time, find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, and at each regular session of the Legislature, make and publish one (1) report to the Governor and to the Legislature, showing for the period of time covered, in each county and for the state as a whole:

The total number of recipients;

The total amount paid to them in cash;

The maximum and the minimum amount paid to any recipients in any one (1) month;

The total number of applications;

The number granted;

The number denied;

The number cancelled;

The amount expended for administration of the provisions of this chapter;

The amount of money received from the federal government, if any;

The amount of money received from recipients of assistance and from their estates and the disposition of same;

Such other information and recommendations as the Governor may require or the department shall deem advisable;

The number of state-owned automobiles purchased and operated during the year by the department, the number purchased and operated out of funds appropriated by the Legislature, the number purchased and operated out of any other public funds, the miles traveled per automobile, the total miles traveled, the average cost per mile and depreciation estimate on each automobile;

The cost per mile and total number of miles traveled by department employees in privately owned automobiles, for which reimbursement is made out of state funds;

Each association, convention or meeting attended by any department employees, the purposes thereof, the names of the employees attending and the total cost to the state of such convention, association or meeting;

How the money appropriated to the institutions under the jurisdiction of the department has been expended during the preceding year, beginning and ending with the fiscal year of each institution, exhibiting the salaries paid to officers and employees of the institutions, and each and every item of receipt and expenditure;

The activities of each office within the Department of Human Services and recommendations for improvement of the services to be performed by each division.

Each report shall be balanced and shall begin with the balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, and if any property belonging to the state or the institution is used for profit, such report shall show the expenses incurred in managing the property and the amount received from the same. Such reports shall also show a summary of the gross receipts and gross disbursements for each fiscal year and shall show the money on hand at the beginning of the fiscal period of each division and institution of the department.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7219; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1946, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 527; Laws, 1952, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 1954, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 349; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 21; Laws, 1983, ch. 504, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 63; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 19; Laws, 1991, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 585, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 523, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 599, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 573, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 537, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 470, § 4; Laws, 2015, ch. 403, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2019, ch. 372, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-1-6.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, effective July 1, 2012.

§43-1-6. [Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 103; Laws, 1992, ch. 585 § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 599, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 573, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 537, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 564, § 5, eff from and after June 30, 2009.]

§ 43-1-7.
Family resource centers; information campaign for low income individuals; telephone hotline for reporting welfare fraud.

The Department of Human Services may establish family resource centers to help families who are receiving or are eligible to receive assistance from government agencies to facilitate their access to services and resources that will lead to increased family independence.

The department shall carry out an intense public information campaign to inform low-income workers, and especially public assistance recipients, of the availability of and application rules for the federal Earned Income Tax Credit (EITC), in order to maximize the refund of federal income tax withheld from those persons. The information campaign shall include publishing and circulating bulletins or notices to recipients of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits and other public assistance that publicize and explain the EITC and the criteria for family eligibility for the EITC. The department also shall carry out an intense information campaign to inform employers of the availability of and the criteria for eligibility for the Work Opportunity Tax Credit (WOTC), which offers employers a credit against their federal tax liability for hiring people from certain target groups, including TANF recipients, and to inform employers of the availability of and the criteria for eligibility for the state income tax credit for employers who hire persons receiving TANF benefits as authorized under Section 27-7-22.1.

The department shall establish and maintain a statewide incoming wide area telephone service hot line for the purpose of reporting suspected cases of welfare eligibility fraud, food stamp fraud and Medicaid fraud. The department is authorized, subject to the extent of appropriations available, to offer financial incentives to individuals for reporting such suspected cases of public assistance fraud.

Any applicant for or recipient of TANF benefits or Food Stamps shall be required to agree that, as a condition of eligibility for those benefits, the person will cooperate with the department in determining paternity for the purposes of enforcing child support obligations. The department shall utilize methods and procedures provided for by state or federal law in determining paternity and enforcing child support obligations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-1-8.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 582, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Laws, 1993, ch. 614, § 12]

§ 43-1-9.
County department of public welfare.

There shall be created in each county of the state a county department of public welfare which shall consist of a county director of public welfare, and such other personnel as may be necessary for the efficient performance of the duties of the county department. It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors of each county to provide office space for the county department.

County director. The commissioner shall designate, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, with the approval of the Governor, a county director of public welfare who shall serve as the executive and administrative officer of the county department and shall be responsible to the state department for its management. Such director shall be a resident citizen of the county and shall not hold any political office of the state, county, municipality or subdivision thereof. However, in cases of emergency, the commissioner may appoint a director of public welfare who is a nonresident of such county, to serve during the period of emergency only.

The county department of public welfare shall administer within the county all forms of public assistance and welfare services. The county department shall comply with such regulations and submit such reports as may be established or required by the state department. Subject to the approval of the state department, the county department may cooperate with other departments, agencies and institutions, state and local, when so requested, in performing services in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

In counties having two (2) judicial districts, the state commissioner of public welfare may create and establish in each of the judicial districts a separate county department of public welfare which shall consist of a director of public welfare and such other personnel as may be necessary for the efficient performance of the duties of the department thus established. In such cases the two (2) departments so established shall be dealt with as though each is a separate and distinct county department of public welfare, and each of the departments and each of the directors shall operate and have jurisdiction coextensive with the boundaries of the judicial district in which it is established; and, also, in such cases the words “county” and “director of public welfare” when used in this chapter shall, where applicable, mean each judicial district, and the director of public welfare appointed therefor; and where the board of supervisors is authorized to appropriate funds or provide office space or like assistance for one (1) county welfare department or director, such board may, as the case may be, appropriate the amount specified by law or render the assistance required by law to each of the departments or directors. Provided, however, that the commissioner of public welfare shall not create and establish a separate county department of public welfare pursuant to this paragraph in any county in which such separate county department of public welfare is not in existence on January 1, 1983. Provided further, that in any county having two (2) county departments of public welfare on January 1, 1983, but only one (1) county director of public welfare on said date, the commissioner of public welfare shall not authorize and establish the second position of county director of public welfare in such county.

In any county not having two (2) judicial districts which is greater than fifty (50) miles in length, the commissioner of public welfare may establish one (1) branch office of the county department of public welfare which shall be staffed with existing employees and administrative staff of such county department for not less than four (4) days per week.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7221; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1946, ch. 233, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 333; Laws, 1958, ch. 538; Laws, 1968, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 503, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 504, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 442, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 43-1-10.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 582, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Laws, 1993, ch. 614, § 14]

§ 43-1-11.
Expenses of county welfare office.

The boards of supervisors of the various counties of this state are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to expend and appropriate such sums as they deem necessary out of any available county funds for the purpose of providing office space for the local county department of public welfare. This includes, but is not limited to, adequate office space for the efficient conduct of business, as well as providing for payment of electricity, water, gas, maintenance and repair of the building, and janitorial services and supplies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7223; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1948, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 187; Laws, 1982, ch. 319, eff from and after October 1, 1982.

§ 43-1-12.
Expenditure of municipal or county funds to support public welfare programs.

The governing authority of any municipality or county in this state is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to expend such funds as it deems necessary and desirable, from any available funds of the municipality or county, to: (a) match any state, federal or private funds available for any program administered by the State Department of Public Welfare or the county departments of public welfare in this state; and/or (b) make a voluntary contribution to any such program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-1-13.
Political activity.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall be unlawful for a commissioner or any other employee of the state or county welfare departments to take an active part in any partisan political campaign. For violation of this provision the offending party shall be removed from office and in addition thereto, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, subject to a fine of not more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).

This section shall not preclude an individual from seeking elective office where the office sought is nonpartisan and is not within the judicial branch of government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7222; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 2010, ch. 439, § 1, eff from and after July 7, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).

§ 43-1-15.
Office of State Department.

The state capitol commission shall furnish office space for the State Department in the city of Jackson and is authorized to rent suitable quarters in the city in the event there is not sufficient room in one of the state houses. In case it is necessary to rent such quarters, the cost of such rental, janitorial service, fuel and janitor’s supplies shall not be counted in determining the administrative cost limitation of Section 43-9-37, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7224; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-1-17.
Cooperation with the federal government.

The state department of public welfare shall cooperate with the federal government, its agencies and instrumentalities, in carrying out the provisions of any federal acts concerning public welfare, and in other matters of mutual concern pertaining to public welfare, including the adoption of such methods of administration as are found by the federal government to be necessary for the efficient operation of plans for public assistance and welfare services in accordance with the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, as amended. It shall also cooperate with other departments, agencies and institutions, federal, state and local or private, when so requested, in performing services in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 9 of this title.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7238; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1968, ch. 562, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved July 30, 1968).

§ 43-1-19.
Disclosure of records of disbursement and payment of public assistance governed by federal regulations; penalty for violation.

The records of the disbursement of funds or payments to recipients of any and all assistance under programs administered by the state or county departments of human services showing the names of the recipients and the amount of the individual assistance checks shall only be disclosed pursuant to federal regulations regarding disclosure of information for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) and Food Stamp Act programs, and federal laws regarding use of electronically exchanged data.

Any person, firm, corporation, association or agency who or which shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety (90) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7219.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 388, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-1-21.
Disposal of abandoned applications, closed case files, and the like.

The state board of public welfare may, in its discretion, destroy or cause to be destroyed, or otherwise disposed of, any and all abandoned applications, closed case files, communications, information, memoranda, records, reports, paid checks, and files, in the office of the state department of public welfare when and as they become three (3) or more completed fiscal years old and which, in the opinion of the state board of public welfare, are no longer useful or necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1948, ch. 404; Laws, 1964, ch. 445.

§ 43-1-23.
Fraud investigation unit; duties; staff; assistance from and to other agencies; issuance of subpoenas.

There is created within the State Department of Human Services a separate administrative unit to be known as the “Fraud Investigation Unit.” The Fraud Investigation Unit shall be headed by a director appointed by the Executive Director of the department. The Director of the Fraud Investigation Unit shall be a person who is knowledgeable in the programs administered by the department. The Fraud Investigation Unit shall be responsible for:

Conducting investigations for the purpose of aiding the department in the detection of and verification of the perpetration of fraud or abuse of any program by any client, any vendor of services with whom the department has contracted or any employee of the department, and for the aiding of the department in the recoupment of any funds owed to the department as a result of fraud or abuse;

The notification and forwarding of any information relevant to possible criminal violations to the appropriate prosecuting authority and assisting in the prosecution of any case referred to a prosecutor, if requested; and

Such other duties as prescribed in regulations of the department.

The Fraud Investigation Unit is authorized to employ such other investigative, technical, secretarial and support staff as may be necessary.

In order to carry out the responsibilities of the Fraud Investigation Unit, the investigators may request and receive assistance from all state and local agencies, boards, commissions, and bureaus including, without limitation, the State Tax Commission, the Department of Public Safety, and all public and private agencies maintaining data banks, criminal or other records that would enable the investigators to make verification of fraud or abuse in violation of state or federal statutes. All records and information shall be confidential and shall be available only to the Fraud Investigation Unit, district or county attorneys, the Attorney General, and courts having jurisdiction in criminal proceedings.

The department is authorized to enter into contracts with other agencies administering aid or benefits or services under any state or federally funded assistance program which need the assistance of the department’s Fraud Investigation Unit.

To accomplish the objectives and to carry out the duties prescribed in this section, the executive director, or his designee, in addition to the powers conferred by this section, may issue subpoenas with the approval of, and returnable to, a judge of the circuit, county or chancery court, in termtime or in vacation, to examine the records, documents or other evidence of persons, firms, corporations or any other entities insofar as such records, documents or other evidence relate to dealings material to an investigation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 530, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 582, § 7; Laws, 1999, ch. 440, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-1-25.
Assistant prosecutors for prosecution of fraud in connection with assistance programs; investigation and prosecution costs to be subsidized.

All political subdivisions of the state, or combinations of political subdivisions, are authorized to employ assistant prosecutors to prosecute for the crimes under Section 97-19-71 and the state department of public welfare is authorized to contract with any political subdivision to subsidize payment for the reasonable and necessary cost of prosecutions and investigations in any program where federal matching funds are available.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 530, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 43-1-27.
Action maintainable by department of public welfare to recover benefits wrongfully obtained; attorney’s fees; evidence.

Any sums paid to or on behalf of any person, entity or subgrantee or the value of any aid or benefit or services obtained or received under any state or federally funded assistance program as a result of any false statement, misrepresentation, concealment of a material fact, failure to disclose assets, or by whatever means, becomes a debt due to the state department of public welfare. The amount of value of any assistance shall be recoverable from the recipient or his estate in a civil action brought in the name of the state department of public welfare pursuant to this section. In the event such action is brought, the department shall be entitled to recover, in addition to the amount of assistance, a reasonable amount of attorney’s fees and its cost incurred therein. Where an attorney from the county attorney’s office represents the department in such action, the attorney’s fee awarded shall be for the use and benefit of that particular office and shall be forwarded to that office upon receipt by the department.

In any civil action for the recovery of the amount of value of any aid or benefits or services improperly paid to the recipient, proof that a conviction or guilty plea on a misdemeanor or felony charge under Section 97-19-71 shall be deemed prima facie evidence that such assistance was improperly obtained under the provision of this section.

Repayment of the assistance improperly obtained pursuant to this section shall not constitute a defense to or ground of dismissal of criminal charges brought under Section 97-19-71.

For purposes of this and other related sections, any food stamp and coupons issued under a food stamp plan administered by the state department of public welfare shall conclusively be the property of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 408, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1983).

§ 43-1-28.
Online electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system for food stamps; pilot project; federal approval and funding.

The Department of Human Services shall develop an online electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system for the food stamp program in Mississippi as an alternative to issuing food stamp coupons. The EBT system developed by the department under this section shall (a) provide that food stamp benefits are stored in and issued from a central computer data base and are electronically accessed by households at the point of sale through the use of reusable magnetic-stripe plastic cards; and (b) meet all requirements and standards specified in 7 USCS Section 2016(i) and the rules and regulations issued under that provision for approval by the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture.

The department shall develop the EBT system and shall submit an application to the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture for approval of the system. After the EBT system has been approved, the department shall implement and operate the system as a pilot project in a county selected by the department. After the pilot project has been evaluated and approved by the United States Department of Agriculture, and subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated therefor, the system may be expanded statewide at a rate determined by the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services. The system shall be expanded and implemented statewide not later than October 1, 2002.

The department shall seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal financial participation available to fund the cost of administering the EBT system.

The Department of Human Services may develop an on-line electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program in Mississippi as an alternative to issuing cash or voucher payments. The EBT system developed by the department under this section shall (a) provide that TANF benefits are stored in and issued from a central computer data base and are electronically accessed; and (b) meet all requirements and standards specified in the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193), and the rules and regulations issued under that act. The department shall seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal financial participation available to fund the cost of administering the EBT system for TANF payments.

In order to facilitate the acquisition and deployment of EBT products and services in Mississippi, the Department of Human Services (DHS) and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS), at their discretion, may utilize EBT agreements from other states and/or multistate coalition agreements that allow other states to acquire EBT products and services. After going through the approved ITS bidding process and the state is unable to acquire an EBT contract, DHS and ITS may negotiate an EBT contract with any vendor who meets DHS and ITS, EBT requirements.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 19; Laws, 1999, ch. 324, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 11, 2001.).

§ 43-1-29.
Offline electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system for food stamps; demonstration project; federal approval and funding.

The Department of Human Services shall develop an offline electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system for the food stamp program in Mississippi as an alternative to issuing food stamp coupons. The EBT system developed by the department under this section shall (a) provide that food stamp benefits are encoded on computer microchips embedded in reusable plastic cards (intelligent benefit cards) and are electronically accessed by households at the point of sale through the use of such cards; and (b) meet all requirements and standards specified in 7 USCS Section 2026(f) and the rules and regulations issued under that provision for approval by the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture as a demonstration project.

The department shall finish development of the EBT system no later than November 1, 1993, and shall submit an application to the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture for approval to operate the system as a demonstration project. If the EBT system is approved as a demonstration project, the department shall implement and operate the system in one (1) county selected by the department. After the demonstration project has been in operation for one (1) year, the department shall evaluate the EBT system and report to the Legislature on the operation of the system.

The department shall seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal financial participation available to fund the cost of administering the EBT system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 383, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993.